Nevada, session 83, AB427.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 355 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. To be eligible to receive private equity funding or a venture
capital investment from the corporation for public benefit
pursuant to this section and NRS 355.250 to 355.285, inclusive, a
business must:
(a) Have a presence in this State as evidenced by:
(1) Being domiciled in this State;
(2) Having a headquarters in this State;
(3) Having a significant percentage of employees residing
in this State; or
(4) Being in the process of expanding in this State or
locating to this State;
(b) Be seeking early-stage investment or middle-stage
investment, or both; and
(c) Be engaged in an industry that is consistent with the State
Plan for Economic Development developed pursuant to
NRS 231.053.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Early-stage investment” means any investment that is
made directly to or on behalf of a business to enable the business
to commence operation, including, without limitation, seed
funding, start-up funding, accelerator funding or early-growth
funding.
(b) “Middle-stage investment” means any investment that is
made directly to or on behalf of a business to enable the business
to expand its operations.
Sec. 2. NRS 355.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
355.270 1. The State Treasurer shall cause to be formed in
this State an independent corporation for public benefit, the general
purpose of which is to act as a limited partner of limited
partnerships or a shareholder or member of limited-liability
companies that provide private equity funding or venture capital
investments, or both, to businesses [:
(a) Located in this State or seeking to locate in this State; and
-
*AB427_R1*

– 4 –
(b) Engaged primarily in one or more of the following
industries:
(1) Health care and life sciences.
(2) Cyber security.
(3) Homeland security and defense.
(4) Alternative energy.
(5) Advanced materials and manufacturing.
(6) Information technology.
(7) Any other industry that the board of directors of the
corporation for public benefit determines will likely meet the targets
for investment returns established by the corporation for public
benefit for investments authorized by NRS 355.250 to 355.285,
inclusive, and comply with sound fiduciary principles.] that meet
the eligibility requirements set forth in section 1 of this act.
2. The corporation for public benefit created pursuant to
subsection 1 must have a board of directors consisting of:
(a) Five members from the private sector who have [at least 10
years of] demonstrated experience in the field of investment,
finance or banking and who are appointed for a term of 4 years as
follows:
(1) One member appointed by the Governor;
(2) One member appointed by the Senate Majority Leader;
(3) One member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly;
(4) One member appointed by the Senate Minority Leader;
and
(5) One member appointed by the Assembly Minority
Leader;
(b) The [Chancellor of the Nevada System of Higher Education]
Executive Director of the Office of Economic Development within
the Office of the Governor or his or her designee;
(c) The State Treasurer; and
(d) With the approval of a majority of the members of the board
of directors described in subparagraphs (1), (2) and (3) of paragraph
(a), up to 5 additional members who are direct investors in the
corporation for public benefit.
3. Vacancies in the appointed positions on the board of
directors of the corporation for public benefit created pursuant to
subsection 1 must be filled by the appointing authority for the
unexpired term.
4. The State Treasurer shall serve as chair of the board of
directors of the corporation for public benefit created pursuant to
subsection 1.
5. The members of the board of directors of the corporation for
public benefit must serve without compensation but are entitled to
be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the
-
*AB427_R1*

– 5 –
performance of their duties, including, without limitation, travel
expenses.
6. A member of the board of directors of the corporation for
public benefit created pursuant to subsection 1 must not have an
equity interest in any:
(a) External asset manager or venture capital or private equity
investment firm contracting with the board pursuant to NRS
355.275; or
(b) Business which receives private equity funding or a venture
capital investment pursuant to NRS 355.250 to 355.285, inclusive
[.] , and section 1 of this act.
7. The board of directors of the corporation for public benefit
created pursuant to subsection 1 shall:
(a) Comply with the provisions of chapter 281A of NRS.
(b) Meet at least quarterly and conduct any meetings of the
board of directors in accordance with chapter 241 of NRS.
(c) Review the performance of all external asset managers and
venture capital and private equity investment firms contracting with
the corporation for public benefit pursuant to NRS 355.275.
(d) On or before December 1 of each year, provide an annual
report to the Governor and the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmission to the next session of the Legislature, if the
report is submitted in an even-numbered year or to the Legislative
Commission, if the report is submitted in an odd-numbered year.
The report must include, without limitation:
(1) An accounting of all money received and expended by
the corporation for public benefit, including, without limitation, any
matching grant funds, gifts or donations; and
(2) The name and a brief description of all businesses
receiving [an] private equity funding or a venture capital
investment [of money] pursuant to the provisions of NRS 355.250
to 355.285, inclusive [.] , and section 1 of this act.
Sec. 3. NRS 355.275 is hereby amended to read as follows:
355.275 1. The corporation for public benefit may [place]
provide private equity funding or venture capital investments
[through the use or assistance of:] pursuant to NRS 355.250 to
355.285, inclusive, and section 1 of this act:
(a) Directly to eligible businesses.
(b) Pursuant to a contract entered into with:
[(a)] (1) External asset managers; [or
(b)] (2) Private equity investment firms [.] ; or
(3) Venture capital investment firms.
2. [Money received pursuant to NRS 355.280 by the] The
corporation for public benefit [may be used to make] shall ensure
-
*AB427_R1*

– 6 –
that private equity funding and venture capital investments [.] are
provided pursuant to subsection 1 in a manner that:
(a) Ensures diversification among the businesses that receive
private equity funding or venture capital investments pursuant to
NRS 355.250 to 355.285, inclusive, and section 1 of this act.
(b) Gives priority to eligible businesses that:
(1) Employ residents of this State;
(2) Provide jobs that are in demand and pay high wages to
residents of this State;
(3) Provide health insurance coverage to its employees; and
(4) Advance environmental sustainability in accordance
with the policies of this State set forth in NRS 445B.380 and
704.7820.
(c) Allows businesses the ability to create new job
opportunities.
(d) Supports new, emerging and expanding businesses in this
State.
Sec. 4. NRS 355.280 is hereby amended to read as follows:
355.280 If the State Treasurer obtains the judicial
determination required by subsection 3 of NRS 355.060, the State
Treasurer may transfer an amount not to exceed $75,000,000 from
the State Permanent School Fund to the corporation for public
benefit. Such a transfer must be made pursuant to an agreement that
requires the corporation for public benefit to:
1. Provide, through the limited partnerships or limited-liability
companies described in subsection 1 of NRS 355.270, private equity
funding [;] or venture capital investments, or both; and
2. Ensure that [more than 50 percent of all] private equity
funding and venture capital investments provided by the
corporation for public benefit, including, without limitation, private
equity funding and venture capital investments provided by a
corporation for public benefit to a pooled fund that includes
businesses located outside of this State, is provided to businesses [:
(a) Located in this State or seeking to locate in this State; and
(b) Engaged primarily in one or more of the following
industries:
(1) Health care and life sciences.
(2) Cyber security.
(3) Homeland security and defense.
(4) Alternative energy.
(5) Advanced materials and manufacturing.
(6) Information technology.
(7) Any other industry that the board of directors of the
corporation for public benefit determines will likely meet the targets
for investment returns established by the corporation for public
-
*AB427_R1*

– 7 –
benefit for investments authorized by NRS 355.250 to 355.285,
inclusive, and comply with sound fiduciary principles.] that meet
the eligibility requirements set forth in section 1 of this act.
Sec. 5. NRS 355.285 is hereby amended to read as follows:
355.285 The State Treasurer:
1. May adopt such regulations as he or she deems necessary to
carry out the provisions of NRS 355.250 to 355.285, inclusive [.] ,
and section 1 of this act.
2. Shall adopt regulations:
(a) Requiring the performance of audits and the submission of
reports to ensure compliance with the provisions of NRS 355.250 to
355.285, inclusive, and section 1 of this act and the regulations
adopted pursuant to this section;
(b) Providing for appropriate leveraging of investments to
ensure that [investments] private equity funding and venture
capital investments provided pursuant to NRS 355.250 to 355.285,
inclusive, and section 1 of this act consist of money transferred
from the State Permanent School Fund pursuant to NRS 355.280
and money from private sources;
(c) Establishing a range or cap on servicing fees;
(d) Establishing limits on the amount or percentage of
investment in a single [venture capital project] business or by a fund
manager; and
(e) Requiring the return of the corpus of investments after a
defined investment period.
3. May adopt regulations which include, without limitation,
criteria for determining eligibility for and use of private equity
funding [,] and venture capital investments, but the corporation for
public benefit must have sole authority for the approval of
applications for and the management of private equity funding and
venture capital investments provided pursuant to NRS 355.250 to
355.285, inclusive [.] , and section 1 of this act.
4. May, by regulation, establish a Business Leadership
Council. The members of the Business Leadership Council must
serve without compensation and are subject to the provisions of
chapter 281A of NRS.
5. Shall provide the corporation for public benefit with such
assistance as is necessary to carry out the provisions of NRS
355.250 to 355.285, inclusive, and section 1 of this act and comply
with the regulations adopted pursuant to this section.
6. Shall ensure that businesses receiving private equity
funding or venture capital investments pursuant to NRS 355.250 to
355.285, inclusive, [have a presence in this State as evidenced by:
(a) Being domiciled in this State;
(b) Having a headquarters in this State;
-
*AB427_R1*

– 8 –
(c) Having a significant percentage of employees residing in this
State; or
(d) Being in the process of expanding in this State or relocating
to this State.] and section 1 of this act continue to meet the
eligibility requirements set forth in section 1 of this act.
Sec. 6. NRS 75A.350 is hereby amended to read as follows:
75A.350 1. The Secretary of State shall ensure that the state
business portal enables a person who applies through the state
business portal for the issuance or renewal of a state business license
pursuant to chapter 76 of NRS to indicate whether the applicant is a
minority-owned business, a woman-owned business, a veteran-
owned business or an LGBTQ-owned business.
2. If a person who applies through the state business portal for
the issuance or renewal of a state business license pursuant to
chapter 76 of NRS indicates that the business is a minority-owned
business, a woman-owned business, a veteran-owned business or an
LGBTQ-owned business, the Secretary of State shall provide the
following information to the person in electronic form through the
state business portal:
(a) Information concerning programs [to] that provide financing
for small businesses. The information must include, without
limitation, information concerning:
(1) Grants or loans of money from the Catalyst Account
created by NRS 231.1573;
(2) The issuance of revenue bonds for industrial development
pursuant to NRS 349.400 to 349.670, inclusive;
(3) The Nevada Collateral Support Program pursuant to 12
U.S.C. §§ 5701 et seq.;
(4) The Nevada Microenterprise Initiative Program pursuant
to 12 U.S.C. §§ 5701 et seq.;
(5) The Nevada New Markets Jobs Act pursuant to chapter
231A of NRS;
(6) [The Nevada Silver State Opportunities Fund] Private
equity funding and venture capital investments pursuant to NRS
[355.275;] 355.250 to 355.285, inclusive, and section 1 of this act;
(7) Loans from the Small Business Administration pursuant
to 15 U.S.C. §§ 631 et seq.; and
(8) Any other program [to provide] that provides financing
for small businesses designated by the Secretary of State.
(b) Information concerning the process by which the business
may become certified as a disadvantaged business enterprise for the
purposes of 49 C.F.R. § 26.5 or a program [to provide] that provides
financing for disadvantaged business enterprises.
3. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations as he or she
deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
-
*AB427_R1*

– 9 –
4. As used in this section:
(a) “LGBTQ” means lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer
or intersex or of any other nonheterosexual or noncisgender
orientation or gender identity or expression.
(b) “LGBTQ-owned business” means a business that:
(1) Is owned by a natural person who identifies as LGBTQ;
or
(2) Has at least 51 percent of its ownership interest held by
one or more natural persons who identify as LGBTQ.
(c) “Veteran” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 417.005.
(d) “Veteran-owned business” means a business that:
(1) Is owned by a natural person who is a veteran; or
(2) Has at least 51 percent of its ownership interest held by
one or more veterans.
Sec. 7. NRS 225.081 is hereby amended to read as follows:
225.081 1. The Secretary of State shall include and maintain
on the Internet website of the Secretary of State information
concerning:
(a) Programs [to] that provide financing for small businesses.
The information must include, without limitation, information
concerning:
(1) Grants or loans of money from the Catalyst Account
created by NRS 231.1573;
(2) The issuance of revenue bonds for industrial development
pursuant to NRS 349.400 to 349.670, inclusive;
(3) The Nevada Collateral Support Program pursuant to 12
U.S.C. §§ 5701 et seq.;
(4) The Nevada Microenterprise Initiative Program pursuant
to 12 U.S.C. §§ 5701 et seq.;
(5) The Nevada New Markets Jobs Act pursuant to chapter
231A of NRS;
(6) [The Nevada Silver State Opportunities Fund established
to make investments] Private equity funding and venture capital
investments pursuant to NRS 355.250 to 355.285, inclusive [;] , and
section 1 of this act;
(7) Loans from the Small Business Administration pursuant
to 15 U.S.C. §§ 631 et seq.; and
(8) Any other program [to provide] that provides financing
for small businesses designated by the Secretary of State.
(b) The process by which the business may become certified as a
disadvantaged business enterprise for the purposes of 49 C.F.R. §
26.5 or a program [to provide] that provides financing for
disadvantaged business enterprises.
2. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations as he or she
deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
-
*AB427_R1*

– 10 –
Sec. 8. NRS 231.14055 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231.14055 1. A business may apply, on a form prescribed by
regulation of the Office, to the Office for certification as a local
emerging small business. The application must be accompanied by
such proof as the Office requires to demonstrate that the applicant is
in compliance with the criteria set forth in NRS 231.1405 and any
regulations adopted pursuant to NRS 231.1408.
2. Upon receipt of the application and when satisfied that the
applicant meets the requirements set forth in this section, NRS
231.1405 and any regulations adopted pursuant to NRS 231.1408,
the Office shall:
(a) Certify the business as a local emerging small business; and
(b) Provide to the business, in written or electronic form,
information concerning public and private programs [to] that are
active or funded, or both, at the time the application of the
business was received and which provide financing for small
businesses and the criteria for obtaining financing through such
programs. The information must include, without limitation,
information concerning:
(1) Grants or loans of money from the Catalyst Account
created by NRS 231.1573;
(2) The issuance of revenue bonds for industrial development
pursuant to NRS 349.400 to 349.670, inclusive;
(3) The Nevada Collateral Support Program pursuant to 12
U.S.C. §§ 5701 et seq.;
(4) The Nevada Microenterprise Initiative Program pursuant
to 12 U.S.C. §§ 5701 et seq.;
(5) The Nevada New Markets Jobs Act pursuant to chapter
231A of NRS;
(6) [The Nevada Silver State Opportunities Fund] Private
equity funding and venture capital investments pursuant to NRS
[355.275;] 355.250 to 355.285, inclusive, and section 1 of this act;
(7) Loans from the Small Business Administration pursuant
to 15 U.S.C. §§ 631 et seq.; and
(8) Any other private program [to provide] that provides
financing for small businesses approved by the Office.
3. The Office shall compile a list of the local emerging small
businesses certified pursuant to this section and post the list on its
Internet website.
-
*AB427_R1*

– 11 –
Sec. 9. Section 20 of the Regional Business Development
Advisory Council for Clark County Act, being chapter 7, Statutes of
Nevada 2003, 20th Special Session, as last amended by chapter 426,
Statutes of Nevada 2017, at page 2863, is hereby amended to read as
follows:
Sec. 20. 1. The Council shall propose and implement
policies, programs and procedures to encourage and promote
the use of local businesses owned and operated by
disadvantaged persons, particularly in the area of contracting
and procurement by public agencies in Clark County.
2. On or before November 1 of each year, each public
entity which has a representative on the Council pursuant to
subsection 1 of section 15 of this act shall prepare and deliver
a written report to the Council for the immediately preceding
fiscal year which contains:
(a) The number of persons employed by the public entity,
disaggregated by major ethnic and racial categories,
including, without limitation, African-American, Asian,
Caucasian, Hispanic and Native American.
(b) Expenditures made by the public entity during the
immediately preceding fiscal year, disaggregated by
discretionary and nondiscretionary expenditures.
(c) The percentage of expenditures paid by the public
entity to local businesses owned and operated by
disadvantaged persons, disaggregated by ethnic and racial
categories and by gender.
(d) A summary of the efforts and programs used by the
public entity to encourage and increase the involvement in
contracting by local businesses owned and operated by
disadvantaged persons and any efforts or programs used by
the public entity to encourage the economic development of
local businesses owned and operated by disadvantaged
persons.
(e) Such other information as the Council determines is
necessary to achieve its goals.
3. The Council shall encourage each public and private
entity which has a representative on the Council pursuant to
subsection 2 of section 15 of this act to prepare and deliver to
the Council an annual report similar to the report required
pursuant to subsection 2.
4. The Council shall provide to local businesses owned
and operated by disadvantaged persons information, in
written or electronic form, concerning public and private
programs [to] that provide financing for small businesses and
-
*AB427_R1*

– 12 –
the criteria for obtaining financing through such programs.
The information must include, without limitation:
(a) Grants or loans of money from the Catalyst Account
created by NRS 231.1573;
(b) The issuance of revenue bonds for industrial
development pursuant to NRS 349.400 to 349.670, inclusive;
(c) The Nevada Collateral Support Program pursuant to
12 U.S.C. §§ 5701 et seq.;
(d) The Nevada Microenterprise Initiative Program
pursuant to 12 U.S.C. §§ 5701 et seq.;
(e) The Nevada New Markets Jobs Act pursuant to
chapter 231A of NRS;
(f) [The Nevada Silver State Opportunities Fund] Private
equity funding and venture capital investments pursuant to
NRS [355.275;] 355.250 to 355.285, inclusive, and section 1
of this act;
(g) Loans from the Small Business Administration
pursuant to 15 U.S.C. §§ 631 et seq.; and
(h) Any other private lending opportunity for small
businesses with which the Council has a working
relationship.
5. On or before January 15 of each odd-numbered year,
the Council shall prepare a report regarding the policies,
programs and procedures that the Council proposed and
implemented during the immediately preceding 2 years to
encourage and promote the use of local businesses owned and
operated by disadvantaged persons, using the reports received
pursuant to this section, and shall submit the report to the
Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to
the next regular session of the Legislature.
Sec. 10. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 9, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB427_R1*